Utah statutes.
70A-1a-202.   Notice -- Knowledge.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (6), a person has "notice" of a fact if the person:
(a)  has actual knowledge of it;
(b)  has received a notice or notification of it; or
(c)  from all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time in
question, has reason to know that it exists.
(2)  "Knowledge" means actual knowledge.  "Knows" has a corresponding meaning.
(3)  "Discover," "learn," or words of similar import refer to knowledge rather
than to reason to know.
(4)  A person "notifies" or "gives" a notice or notification to another person
by taking such steps as may be reasonably required to inform the other person
in ordinary course, whether or not the other person actually comes to know of
it.
(5)  Subject to Subsection (6), a person "receives" a notice or notification
when:
(a)  it comes to that person's attention; or
(b)  it is duly delivered in a form reasonable under the circumstances at the
place of business through which the contract was made or at another location
held out by that person as the place for receipt of such communications.
(6)  Notice, knowledge, or a notice or notification received by an
organization is effective for a particular transaction from the time it is
brought to the attention of the individual conducting that transaction and, in
any event, from the time it would have been brought to the individual's
attention if the organization had exercised due diligence.  An organization
exercises due diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating
significant information to the person conducting the transaction and there is
reasonable compliance with the routines.  Due diligence does not require an
individual acting for the organization to communicate information unless the
communication is part of the individual's regular duties or the individual has
reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially
affected by the information.
